Oklahoma, session 2026, SB302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 34.601 of Title 62, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a fund to be


known and designated as the “Oklahoma Law Enforcement Legacy Fund”.


The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year


limitations, and shall consist of surplus monies and savings


appropriated by the Legislature.



Req. No. 76 Page 1


B. The State Treasurer shall appoint qualified investment


managers to provide for the investment of the monies of the fund.


The investments shall be consistent with the manner in which state


retirement funds are invested. The risk of large losses shall be


minimized by diversifying the investments in the fund, unless, under


the circumstances, it is clearly prudent not to do so, which shall


include the length of time of the investment. The investment


managers may sell investments and realize losses if such action is


considered advantageous to longer-term return maximization.


C. The fund principal shall consist of monies which are


deposited to the fund. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law,


income and investment return on fund principal shall accrue to the


fund.


D. For each fiscal year, the Treasurer shall make available a


report on its website detailing the present value of the investments


and assets in the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Legacy Fund and the


increase in value from the previous fiscal year.


E. Except as provided for in subsections F and G of this


section, upon a determination by the Treasurer, through the report


provided pursuant to subsection D of this section, that the increase


in the value of the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Legacy Fund from the


previous fiscal year exceeds One Hundred Million Dollars


($100,000,000.00) or any additional whole increments of One Hundred


Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00), a transfer to the General Revenue

Req. No. 76 Page 2


Fund, solely for the purpose of increasing the wages of law


enforcement in this state, shall be made on January 1 of each


subsequent calendar year in an amount equal to the highest whole


one-hundred-million-dollar increment, as determined by the


Treasurer.


F. Except as provided for in subsection G of this section, upon


a subsequent determination by the Treasurer, through the report


provided pursuant to subsection D of this section, that the Oklahoma


Law Enforcement Legacy Fund increased in value by any whole


increments of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) greater


than the most recent January 1 transfer to the General Revenue Fund


made pursuant to the provisions of this section, each subsequent


January 1 transfer shall be made in an amount equal to the highest


whole one-hundred-million-dollar increment that the Oklahoma Law


Enforcement Legacy Fund increased in value, as determined by the


Treasurer.


G. Investment managers appointed pursuant to subsection B of


this section shall maintain a reasonable proportion of liquid assets


in the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Legacy Fund in order to facilitate


any expected transfers required pursuant to subsections E and F of


this section. In the event the balance of the Oklahoma Law


Enforcement Legacy Fund is insufficient or the cash available in the


fund is insufficient due to lack of liquid assets to make the


transfers required pursuant to subsections E and F of this section,

Req. No. 76 Page 3


the entire balance available for transfer shall be transferred to


the fund.


SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of the


State Treasurer for deposit in the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Legacy


Fund, from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General


Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June


30, 2023, the sum of Five Hundred Sixty-three Million Six Hundred


Ninety-six Thousand Six Hundred Twenty-six Dollars


($563,696,626.00).


SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of the


State Treasurer for deposit in the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Legacy


Fund, from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General


Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June


30, 2024, the sum of Seven Hundred Fifty-nine Million Three Hundred


Ninety-two Thousand Nine Hundred Sixty-four Dollars


($759,392,964.00).


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-76 QD 12/30/2024 11:48:56 PM



Req. No. 76 Page 4